Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1213.01
Records; violation; prosecute.

The State Records Administrator, or any official under whose authority such records belong, shall report to the proper county attorney any supposed violation of section 84-1213 that in its judgment warrants prosecution. It shall be the duty of the several county attorneys to investigate supposed violations of such section and to prosecute violations of such section.

Laws 1973, LB 224, § 16.